Connecticut, session 2026, SB00342.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Each insurer, health care
2 center, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation,
3 preferred provider network or other entity that enters into, renews or
4 amends a contract with a health care provider on or after July 1, 2026, to
5 provide covered benefits to insureds or enrollees in this state shall
6 include in such contract:
7 (1) A provision requiring such insurer, health care center, hospital
8 service corporation, medical service corporation, preferred provider
9 network or other entity to:
10 (A) Reimburse the contracting health care provider for a covered
11 outpatient benefit that uses a current procedural terminology
12 evaluation and management (CPT E/M) code, current procedural
13 terminology assessment and management (CPT A/M) code, telehealth
14 codes or drug infusion code in an amount that does not vary based on
SB342 / File No. 223 1

SB342 File No. 223
15 the facility where the contracting health care provider provides such
16 benefit; and
17 (B) Use equal reimbursement rates for all contracting health care
18 providers in the same geographic region, as determined by the
19 Insurance Commissioner, and regardless of the employer or affiliation
20 of any contracting health care provider, for each covered outpatient
21 benefit described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision if the
22 reimbursement for such covered outpatient benefit is made on a fee-for-
23 benefit basis or on the basis of bundled benefits per diagnosis, condition,
24 procedure or another standardized bundle of health care benefits; and
25 (2) A conspicuous statement that such contract complies with the
26 provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
27 (b) The Insurance Commissioner shall adopt regulations, in
28 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
29 implement the provisions of this section.
30 Sec. 2. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 38a-477i of the
31 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
32 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
33 (2) "Anti-steering clause" means any provision, including, but not
34 limited to, utilization management provisions, in a health care contract
35 that restricts the ability of the health carrier or health plan administrator
36 from encouraging an enrollee to obtain a health care service from a
37 competitor of a hospital or health system, including offering incentives
38 to encourage enrollees to utilize specific health care providers such as
39 centers of excellence or any other pay-for-performance program;
40 Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) The Insurance Commissioner shall
41 conduct a study concerning various revisions to the insurance statutes,
42 including, but not limited to, statutes concerning (1) excess insurance,
43 (2) the Health Care Cabinet, and (3) outpatient health care services,
44 including, injections and infusions, provided at a hospital-based facility
45 located off-site from a hospital campus. Not later than January 1, 2027,
SB342 / File No. 223 2

SB342 File No. 223
46 the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance with the
47 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
48 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
49 relating to insurance on the results and recommendations of such study.
50 Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this
51 section, "clinical peer" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
52 591a of the general statutes, "health carrier" has the same meaning as
53 provided in section 38a-1080 of the general statutes and "downcode"
54 means any adjustment of a health benefit claim by any insurer, health
55 care center, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation,
56 preferred provider network or other entity to a less complex or lower
57 cost billing code in order to provide a lower reimbursement to a health
58 care provider for such health benefit claim than is required for the actual
59 service performed pursuant to such contract between such health care
60 provider and such entity.
61 (b) No health carrier shall use a software tool, including, but not
62 limited to, artificial intelligence or an algorithm, to automatically
63 downcode or deny a health insurance claim submitted by a health care
64 provider without review by a clinical peer.
65 Sec. 5. Subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of section
66 38a-472f of the general statutes is repealed and the following is
67 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
68 (C) For each contract entered into, renewed, amended or continued
69 on or after July 1, 2023, between a health carrier and a participating
70 provider that is a hospital, as defined in section 38a-493, or a parent
71 corporation of a hospital or an intermediary of a hospital, if the contract
72 is not renewed or is terminated by either the health carrier or the
73 participating provider, the health carrier and the participating provider
74 shall continue to abide by the terms of such contract, including
75 reimbursement terms for all health care services and provisions
76 provided under such contract, [for a period of sixty days from the date
77 of termination or, in the case of a nonrenewal, from the end of the
78 contract period. Except as otherwise agreed between such health carrier
SB342 / File No. 223 3

SB342 File No. 223
79 and such participating provider, the reimbursement terms of any
80 contract entered into by such health carrier and such participating
81 provider during said sixty-day period shall be retroactive to the date of
82 termination or, in the case of a nonrenewal, the end date of the contract
83 period. This subparagraph shall not apply if the health carrier and
84 participating provider agree, in writing, to the termination or
85 nonrenewal of the contract and the health carrier and participating
86 provider provide the notices required under subparagraphs (A) and (B)
87 of this subdivision] until the earlier of the date the dispute is resolved
88 or the policyholder's renewal date.
89 Sec. 6. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 38a-591c of the
90 general statutes is amended by adding subparagraph (D) as follows
91 (Effective January 1, 2027):
92 (NEW) (D) For each utilization review of a health care service ordered
93 by a provider in the highest tier or level of the health carrier's tiered
94 network, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such health care
95 service under review is medically necessary if such service was ordered
96 by a provider in the highest tier or level of a health carrier's tiered
97 network acting within such provider's scope of practice. A health
98 carrier, or any utilization review company or designee of a health carrier
99 that performs utilization review on behalf of the health carrier, shall
100 have the burden of proving that a health care service ordered by a
101 provider in the highest tier or level of such health carrier's tiered
102 network is not medically necessary. For purposes of this subparagraph,
103 "tiered network" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-472f,
104 as amended by this act.
105 Sec. 7. Subsection (c) of section 38a-591e of the general statutes is
106 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
107 1, 2027):
108 (c) (1) (A) When conducting a review of an adverse determination
109 under this section, the health carrier shall ensure that such review is
110 conducted in a manner to ensure the independence and impartiality of
111 the clinical peer or peers involved in making the review decision.
SB342 / File No. 223 4

SB342 File No. 223
112 (B) If the adverse determination involves utilization review, the
113 health carrier shall designate an appropriate clinical peer or peers to
114 review such adverse determination. Such clinical peer or peers shall not
115 have been involved in the initial adverse determination.
116 (C) (i) For each review of an adverse determination under this section
117 for a health care service ordered by a provider in the highest tier or level
118 of the health carrier's tiered network, there shall be a rebuttable
119 presumption that each health care service under review is medically
120 necessary if such service was ordered by a provider in the highest tier
121 or level of such health carrier's tiered network acting within such
122 provider's scope of practice. The health carrier may rebut such
123 presumption by reasonably substantiating to the clinical peer or peers
124 conducting the review under this section that such service is not
125 medically necessary. For purposes of this clause, "tiered network" has
126 the same meaning as provided in section 38a-472f, as amended by this
127 act.
128 [(C)] (ii) The clinical peer or peers conducting a review under this
129 section shall take into consideration all comments, documents, records
130 and other information relevant to the covered person's benefit request
131 that is the subject of the adverse determination under review, that are
132 submitted by the covered person or the covered person's authorized
133 representative, regardless of whether such information was submitted
134 or considered in making the initial adverse determination.
135 (D) Prior to issuing a decision, the health carrier shall provide free of
136 charge, by facsimile, electronic means or any other expeditious method
137 available, to the covered person or the covered person's authorized
138 representative, as applicable, any new or additional documents,
139 communications, information and evidence relied upon and any new or
140 additional scientific or clinical rationale used by the health carrier in
141 connection with the grievance. Such documents, communications,
142 information, evidence and rationale shall be provided sufficiently in
143 advance of the date the health carrier is required to issue a decision to
144 permit the covered person or the covered person's authorized
SB342 / File No. 223 5

SB342 File No. 223
145 representative, as applicable, a reasonable opportunity to respond prior
146 to such date.
147 (2) If the review under subdivision (1) of this subsection is an
148 expedited review, all necessary information, including the health
149 carrier's decision, shall be transmitted between the health carrier and the
150 covered person or the covered person's authorized representative, as
151 applicable, by telephone, facsimile, electronic means or any other
152 expeditious method available.
153 (3) If the review under subdivision (1) of this subsection is an
154 expedited review of a grievance involving an adverse determination of
155 a concurrent review request, pursuant to 45 CFR 147.136, as amended
156 from time to time, the treatment shall be continued without liability to
157 the covered person until the covered person has been notified of the
158 review decision.
159 Sec. 8. Subsection (a) of section 38a-510 of the 2026 supplement to the
160 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
161 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
162 (a) No insurance company, hospital service corporation, medical
163 service corporation, health care center or other entity delivering, issuing
164 for delivery, renewing, amending or continuing an individual health
165 insurance policy or contract that provides coverage for prescription
166 drugs may:
167 (1) Require any person covered under such policy or contract to
168 obtain prescription drugs from a mail order pharmacy as a condition of
169 obtaining benefits for such drugs; or
170 (2) Require, if such insurance company, hospital service corporation,
171 medical service corporation, health care center or other entity uses step
172 therapy for such drugs, the use of step therapy (A) for any prescribed
173 drug for longer than thirty days, (B) for a prescribed drug for cancer
174 treatment [for an insured who has been diagnosed with stage IV
175 metastatic cancer, multiple sclerosis or rheumatoid arthritis, provided
SB342 / File No. 223 6

SB342 File No. 223
176 such prescribed drug is in compliance with approved federal Food and
177 Drug Administration indications] or for the treatment of disabling or
178 life-threatening chronic diseases, or (C) for the treatment of
179 schizophrenia, major depressive disorder or bipolar disorder, as defined
180 in the most recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association's
181 "Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders".
182 (3) At the expiration of the time period specified in subparagraph (A)
183 of subdivision (2) of this subsection or for a prescribed drug described
184 in subparagraph (B) or (C) of subdivision (2) of this subsection, an
185 insured's treating health care provider may deem such step therapy
186 drug regimen clinically ineffective for the insured, at which time the
187 insurance company, hospital service corporation, medical service
188 corporation, health care center or other entity shall authorize
189 dispensation of and coverage for the drug prescribed by the insured's
190 treating health care provider, provided such drug is a covered drug
191 under such policy or contract. If such provider does not deem such step
192 therapy drug regimen clinically ineffective or has not requested an
193 override pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section,
194 such drug regimen may be continued. For purposes of this section, "step
195 therapy" means a protocol or program that establishes the specific
196 sequence in which prescription drugs for a specified medical condition
197 are to be prescribed.
198 Sec. 9. Subsection (a) of section 38a-544 of the 2026 supplement to the
199 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
200 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
201 (a) No insurance company, hospital service corporation, medical
202 service corporation, health care center or other entity delivering, issuing
203 for delivery, renewing, amending or continuing a group health
204 insurance policy or contract that provides coverage for prescription
205 drugs may:
206 (1) Require any person covered under such policy or contract to
207 obtain prescription drugs from a mail order pharmacy as a condition of
208 obtaining benefits for such drugs; or
SB342 / File No. 223 7

SB342 File No. 223
209 (2) Require, if such insurance company, hospital service corporation,
210 medical service corporation, health care center or other entity uses step
211 therapy for such drugs, the use of step therapy (A) for any prescribed
212 drug for longer than thirty days, (B) for a prescribed drug for cancer
213 treatment [for an insured who has been diagnosed with stage IV
214 metastatic cancer, multiple sclerosis or rheumatoid arthritis, provided
215 such prescribed drug is in compliance with approved federal Food and
216 Drug Administration indications] or for the treatment of disabling or
217 life-threatening chronic diseases, or (C) for the treatment of
218 schizophrenia, major depressive disorder or bipolar disorder, as defined
219 in the most recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association's
220 "Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders".
221 (3) At the expiration of the time period specified in subparagraph (A)
222 of subdivision (2) of this subsection or for a prescribed drug described
223 in subparagraph (B) or (C) of subdivision (2) of this subsection, an
224 insured's treating health care provider may deem such step therapy
225 drug regimen clinically ineffective for the insured, at which time the
226 insurance company, hospital service corporation, medical service
227 corporation, health care center or other entity shall authorize
228 dispensation of and coverage for the drug prescribed by the insured's
229 treating health care provider, provided such drug is a covered drug
230 under such policy or contract. If such provider does not deem such step
231 therapy drug regimen clinically ineffective or has not requested an
232 override pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section,
233 such drug regimen may be continued. For purposes of this section, "step
234 therapy" means a protocol or program that establishes the specific
235 sequence in which prescription drugs for a specified medical condition
236 are to be prescribed.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 38a-477i(a)(2)
Sec. 3 from passage New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
SB342 / File No. 223 8

SB342 File No. 223
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 38a-472f(g)(1)(C)
Sec. 6 January 1, 2027 38a-591c(a)(2)(D)
Sec. 7 January 1, 2027 38a-591e(c)
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 38a-510(a)
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 38a-544(a)
INS Joint Favorable
SB342 / File No. 223 9

SB342 File No. 223
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
State Comptroller - Fringe Various - 67.3 million 130 million
Benefits Potential Cost
State Comptroller - Fringe Various - See Below See Below
Benefits Indeterminate
UConn Health Ctr. OF - Revenue See Below See Below
Gain
UConn Health Ctr. OF - See Below See Below
Indeterminate
Note: Various=Various; OF=Other Funds
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential Cost See Below See Below
Various Municipalities Indeterminate See Below See Below
Explanation
The bill makes various changes regarding health insurance and
patient protection, including establishing a rebuttable presumption or
utilization review, which would likely result in a cost of $67.3 million
across various funds beginning in FY 27, annualized to $130 million in
FY 28. The bill makes various other changes anticipated to result in the
fiscal impacts described below.
Section 1 results in an indeterminate cost annually beginning in FY
27 to the state employee health plan (SEHP), municipalities on the state
partnership plan (SPP), and UConn Health Center (UCHC). It requires
health carriers and preferred provider networks that contract with
SB342 / File No. 223 10

SB342 File No. 223
health care providers to pay equal reimbursement rates for certain
outpatient services regardless of the facility where the services occur.
The impact to the SEHP and the SPP will depend on the rates set by
health carriers and preferred provider networks. The bill does not
specify these rates. The fiscal impact to UCHC will depend on: (1) the
difference between the UCHC's current reimbursement rates in
hospital-based settings and those set pursuant to the bill; and (2) the
number of procedures performed.
Section 4 results in: (1) a potential cost annually beginning in FY 27
to the SEHP and the SPP; and (2) a potential revenue gain annually
beginning in FY 27 to the UCHC. The section prohibits carriers from
using software tools to automatically downcode or deny a health
insurance claim without being reviewed by a clinical peer.
The potential cost to the SEHP and the SPP will depend on the extent
to which more expensive and frequent claims impact premiums. The
extent of the potential revenue gain to the UCHC will depend on: (1) the
reimbursement gain that occurs by preventing downcoding, and (2) the
number of health insurance claims paid out that would have otherwise
been denied.
Sections 6 and 7 result in: (1) a potential cost to the state beginning
in FY 27 of $60.5 million across various funds, annualized to $121 million
in FY 28; (2) a potential cost to fully insured municipalities and those
enrolled in the SPP; and (3) a potential revenue gain annually beginning
in FY 27 to UCHC. The sections establish a rebuttable presumption that
a health care service undergoing utilization review is medically
necessary if ordered by a health care professional in the highest tier of
their network.
The cost to the state is associated with increased pharmacy and
medical utilization for the SEHP. Medical claims costs are expected to
increase by approximately 20% as more services are deemed "medically
necessary" resulting from the change in utilization review methodology.
This annualized impact is estimated to be $92 million. The annualized
SB342 / File No. 223 11

SB342 File No. 223
impact of the change in utilization review on pharmacy benefits is
estimated to be $29 million, largely driven by costs related to specialty
drugs.
Fully insured municipalities and those participating in the SPP are
likely to see an increase in premiums to the extent carriers expect to see
higher utilization of services. Municipalities enrolled in the SPP will
likely see costs commensurate with the increase to the SEHP based on
their enrollment.
The revenue gain to the UCHC will depend on the extent to which
the rebuttable presumption results in an increase in insurance claims
paid out.
Sections 8 and 9 result in: (1) a potential cost to the state beginning
in FY 27 of $6.75 million across various funds, annualized to $9 million
in FY 28 for increased premiums for the SEHP; and (2) a potential cost
to fully insured municipalities and those enrolled in the SPP. The
sections restrict the use of step therapy on prescription drugs used to
treat disabling or life-threatening chronic diseases.
Step therapy is used as a cost management tool, and its prohibition
for prescription drugs to treat disabling or life-threatening chronic
diseases is likely to be reflected in higher premiums through an
increased per member per month cost. These restrictions are estimated
to increase costs related to the differential between the lower cost
alternative and the drug available after step therapy, as well as overall
higher prescription drug spend.
These sections also result in potential costs to various municipalities
that either have fully insured health plans or participate in the SPP to
the extent higher utilization and prescription drug costs increase plan
premiums. The SPP would face costs commensurate with the increase
to the SEHP based on their enrollment.
Additionally, Section 2 clarifies "anti-steering" clauses by adding
utilization management to the definition resulting in no fiscal impact.
SB342 / File No. 223 12

SB342 File No. 223
Section 3 requires the Insurance Department to conduct a study
concerning revisions to the insurance statutes, which results in no fiscal
impact as the department has the expertise to meet the requirements.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
SB342 / File No. 223 13

SB342 File No. 223
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 342
AN ACT CONCERNING HEALTH COVERAGE.
TABLE OF CONTENTS: